Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,138
Complaint; investigation; confidentiality; immunity; department; powers and duties.

(1) Any person may make a complaint and request investigation of an alleged violation of the Uniform Credentialing Act or rules and regulations issued under such act. A complaint submitted to the department shall be confidential, and a person making a complaint shall be immune from criminal or civil liability of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for filing a complaint or for disclosure of documents, records, or other information to the department.

(2) The department shall review all complaints and determine whether to conduct an investigation and in making such determination may consider factors such as:

(a) Whether the complaint pertains to a matter within the authority of the department to enforce;

(b) Whether the circumstances indicate that a complaint is made in good faith and is not malicious, frivolous, or vexatious;

(c) Whether the complaint is timely or has been delayed too long to justify present evaluation of its merit;

(d) Whether the complainant may be a necessary witness if action is taken and is willing to identify himself or herself and come forward to testify; or

(e) Whether the information provided or within the knowledge of the complainant is sufficient to provide a reasonable basis to believe that a violation has occurred or to secure necessary evidence from other sources.

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 56;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-168.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 138.